Massachusetts, session 194th, H1234.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 176O of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
2 following section:-
3 Section 31. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
4 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
5 “Cost-sharing”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 176Y.
6 “Estimated rebate”, any: (i) negotiated price concessions, whether described as a rebate
7 or otherwise, including, but not limited to, base price concessions, and reasonable estimates of
8 any price protection rebates and performance-based price concessions that may accrue, directly
9 or indirectly, to a carrier, pharmacy benefit manager or other party on a carrier’s behalf during a
10 carrier’s plan year from a pharmaceutical manufacturing company, dispensing pharmacy or other
11 party to the transaction based on the amounts the carrier received in the prior quarter or
12 reasonably expects to receive in the current quarter; and (ii) reasonable estimates of any price
1 of 12

13 concessions, fees and other administrative costs that are passed through, or are reasonably
14 anticipated to be passed through to the carrier, pharmacy benefit manager or other party on the
15 carrier’s behalf and that serve to reduce the carrier’s prescription drug liabilities for the plan year
16 based on the amounts the carrier received in the prior quarter or reasonably expects to receive in
17 the current quarter.
18 “Pharmacy benefit manager”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 176Y.
19 “Price protection rebate”, a negotiated price concession that accrues directly or indirectly
20 to the carrier, or other party on behalf of the carrier, including a pharmacy benefit manager, in
21 the event of an increase in the wholesale acquisition cost of a drug that is greater than a specified
22 threshold.
23 (b) A carrier, or any pharmacy benefit manager, shall make available to an insured at
24 least 80 per cent of the estimated rebates received by such carrier, or any pharmacy benefit
25 manager, by reducing the amount of defined cost-sharing that the carrier would otherwise charge
26 at the point of sale, except that the reduction amount shall not result in a credit at the point of
27 sale. Neither the insured nor the carrier shall be responsible for any difference between the
28 estimated rebate amount and the actual rebate amount the carrier receives; provided, that such
29 estimates were calculated in good faith.
30 (c) Nothing in this section shall preclude a pharmacy benefit manager from decreasing an
31 insured’s defined cost-sharing by an amount greater than that required under subsection (b).
32 (d) Annually, not later than April 1, a carrier shall file with the division a report in the
33 manner and form determined by the commissioner demonstrating the manner in which the carrier
34 has complied with this section. If the commissioner determines that a carrier has not complied
2 of 12

35 with 1 or more requirements of this section, the commissioner shall notify the carrier of such
36 noncompliance and a date by which the carrier must demonstrate compliance. If the carrier does
37 not come into compliance by such date, the division shall impose a fine not to exceed $5,000 for
38 each day during which such noncompliance continues.
39 (e) In implementing the requirements of this section, the division shall only regulate a
40 carrier or pharmacy benefit manager to the extent permissible under applicable law.
41 (f) A pharmacy benefit manager, its agent or any third-party administrator shall not
42 publish or otherwise disclose information regarding the actual amount of rebates a carrier
43 receives on a specific product or therapeutic class of products, manufacturer or pharmacy-
44 specific basis. Such information shall be considered to be a trade secret and confidential
45 commercial information, shall not be a public record as defined by clause Twenty-sixth of
46 section 7 of chapter 4 or section 10 of chapter 66, and shall not be disclosed directly or
47 indirectly, or in a manner that would allow for the identification of an individual product,
48 therapeutic class of products or manufacturer, or in a manner that would have the potential to
49 compromise the financial, competitive or proprietary nature of the information. A pharmacy
50 benefit manager shall impose the confidentiality protections and requirements of this section on
51 any agent or third-party administrator that performs health care or administrative services on
52 behalf of the pharmacy benefit manager that may receive or have access to rebate related
53 information.
54 SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 176Y of the General Laws, as most recently amended
55 by section 37 of chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the
56 definition of “Center” the following definition:-
3 of 12

57 “Clean claim”, a claim that has no defect or impropriety, including a lack of any required
58 substantiating documentation, or other circumstance requiring special treatment that prevents
59 timely payment from being made on the claim.
60 SECTION 3. Said section 1 of said chapter 176Y, as most recently amended by said
61 section 37 of said chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after
62 the definition of “Commissioner” the following definition:-
63 “Cost-sharing”, any copayment, coinsurance, deductible or any other amount owed by an
64 insured under the terms of the insured’s health benefit plan, or as required by a pharmacy benefit
65 manager.
66 SECTION 4. Said section 1 of said chapter 176Y, as most recently amended by said
67 section 37 of said chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after
68 the definition of “Pharmacy benefit manager” the following 2 definitions:-
69 “Spread pricing”, model of prescription drug pricing in which the pharmacy benefits
70 manager charges a health benefit plan a contracted price for prescription drugs, and the
71 contracted price for the prescription drugs differs from the amount the pharmacy benefits
72 manager directly or indirectly pays the pharmacy.
73 “Third-party administrator”, any person that directly or indirectly solicits or effects
74 coverage of, underwrites, collects charges or premiums from, arranges alternative access to or
75 funding for prescription drugs, or adjusts or settles claims on behalf of residents of the
76 commonwealth or residents of another state from offices in this commonwealth, in connection
77 with health insurance coverage.
4 of 12

78 SECTION 5. Said chapter 176Y, as most recently amended by said section 37 of said
79 chapter 342 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after section 4 the
80 following 9 sections:-
81 Section 5. (a)(1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall have a duty to perform pharmacy
82 benefit management services with care, skill, prudence, diligence and professionalism. Such duty
83 shall extend to both the insured and the health plan for whom the pharmacy benefit manager is
84 performing pharmacy benefit management services.
85 (2) A pharmacy benefit manager interacting with an insured shall have the same duty to
86 an insured as the health plan for whom it is performing pharmacy benefit services.
87 (b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall have a duty of good faith and fair dealing with all
88 parties with which it interacts in the performance of pharmacy benefit management services.
89 Section 6. (a) A pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a reasonably adequate and
90 accessible pharmacy benefit manager network for the provision of prescription drugs, which
91 shall provide for convenient patient access to pharmacies within a reasonable distance from a
92 patient’s residence.
93 (b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not deny a pharmacy the opportunity to participate
94 in a pharmacy benefit manager network at preferred participation status if the pharmacy is
95 willing to accept the terms and conditions that the pharmacy benefit manager has established for
96 other pharmacies as a condition of preferred network participation status.
97 (c) A mail-order pharmacy shall not be included in the calculations for determining
98 pharmacy benefit manager network adequacy.
5 of 12

99 Section 7. (a) After adjudication of a clean claim for payment made by a pharmacy, a
100 pharmacy benefit manager shall not retroactively reduce payment on the claim, either directly or
101 indirectly, through an aggregated effective rate, direct or indirect remuneration, quality assurance
102 program or otherwise, except if the claim: (i) is found not to be a clean claim during the course
103 of a routine audit performed pursuant to an agreement between the pharmacy benefit manager
104 and the pharmacy; or (ii) was submitted as a result of fraud, waste, abuse or other intentional
105 misconduct.
106 (b) When a pharmacy adjudicates a claim, the reimbursement amount provided to the
107 pharmacy by the pharmacy benefit manager shall constitute a final reimbursement amount;
108 provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any retroactive
109 increase in payment to a pharmacy pursuant to a contract between the pharmacy benefit manager
110 or a pharmacy.
111 (c) No pharmacy benefit manager shall charge or collect from an insured any cost-sharing
112 amount that exceeds the total contracted amount by the pharmacy for which the pharmacy is
113 paid. If an insured pays a copayment, the pharmacy shall retain the adjudicated costs and the
114 pharmacy benefit manager shall not reduce or recoup the adjudicated cost.
115 Section 8. (a) As used in this section the following words shall, unless the context clearly
116 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
117 “Generically equivalent drug”, a drug that is pharmaceutically and therapeutically
118 equivalent to the drug prescribed.
6 of 12

119 “Maximum allowable cost list”, a listing of drugs or other methodology used by a
120 pharmacy benefit manager, directly or indirectly, to set the maximum allowable payment to a
121 pharmacy for a generic drug.
122 “National Drug Code”, the numerical code assigned to a prescription drug by the United
123 States Food and Drug Administration.
124 “Pharmacy acquisition cost”, the net amount a pharmacy paid for a pharmaceutical
125 product.
126 “Pharmacy benefit manager affiliate”, a pharmacy that directly or indirectly, through 1 or
127 more intermediaries, owns or controls, is owned or controlled by or is under common ownership
128 or control with a pharmacy benefits manager.
129 (b) A drug shall not be placed on a maximum allowable cost list unless:
130 (i) the drug is a generically equivalent drug, it is listed as therapeutically equivalent and
131 pharmaceutically equivalent A or B rated in the United States Food and Drug Administration's
132 most recent version of the Orange Book or Green Book, it has an NR or NA rating by Medi-Span
133 or Gold Standard, or it has a similar rating by a nationally recognized reference;
134 (ii) the drug is in stock and available for purchase by each pharmacy in the pharmacy
135 benefit manager’s network from wholesale drug distributors licensed under section 36B of
136 chapter 112; and
137 (iii) the drug is not obsolete.
138 (c) A pharmacy benefit manager shall:
7 of 12

139 (i) provide access to its maximum allowable cost list to each pharmacy in the pharmacy
140 benefit manager’s network that is subject to the maximum allowable cost list;
141 (ii) update its maximum allowable cost list on a timely basis, but not less than once every
142 7 calendar days;
143 (iii) provide a process for each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list to
144 receive prompt notification of an update to the maximum allowable cost list; and
145 (iv) provide a reasonable internal grievance process consistent with subsection (d) to
146 allow pharmacies to challenge a maximum allowable cost list as not compliant with this section,
147 and to challenge reimbursements made under a maximum allowable cost list for a specific drug
148 or drugs that are below the pharmacy acquisition cost.
149 (d)(1) A pharmacy benefit manager shall maintain a formal internal grievance process for
150 pharmacies, in a form approved by the commissioner, and such formal internal grievance process
151 shall provide for adequate consideration and timely resolution of grievances. A pharmacy benefit
152 manager’s internal grievance process shall include the following: (i) a dedicated telephone
153 number, email address and website for the purpose of submitting a grievance; (ii) the ability to
154 submit a grievance directly to the pharmacy benefit manager regarding the pharmacy benefits
155 plan or program; and (iii) the ability to file a grievance within not less than 30 business days of
156 the qualifying event.
157 (2) The pharmacy benefit manager shall respond to a grievance within 30 business days
158 of receipt of the grievance. If the pharmacy benefit manager determines as a result of the internal
159 grievance process that the pharmacy benefit manager’s challenged conduct was not compliant
160 with this section, the pharmacy benefit manager shall: (i) provide the pharmacy with the National
8 of 12

161 Drug Code upon which the maximum allowable cost was based; (ii) reprocess the claim; (iii)
162 reimburse the pharmacy in an amount that is not less than the pharmacy acquisition cost; and (iv)
163 to the extent practicable, reprocess claims submitted by similarly situated pharmacies and
164 reimburse said pharmacies an amount that is not less than the pharmacy acquisition cost.
165 (3) If the pharmacy benefit manager determines as a result of the internal grievance
166 process that the pharmacy benefit manager’s challenged conduct was compliant with this section,
167 the pharmacy benefit manager shall: (i) provide the pharmacy with the National Drug Code upon
168 which the maximum allowable cost was based and the name of any wholesale drug distributors
169 licensed under section 36B of chapter 112 that have the drug currently in stock at a price below
170 the maximum allowable cost; or (ii) if the National Drug Code provided by the pharmacy benefit
171 manager is not available at a price below the pharmacy acquisition cost from the wholesale drug
172 distributor from whom the pharmacy purchases the majority of its prescription drugs for resale,
173 then the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the maximum allowable cost as listed on the
174 maximum allowable cost list above the challenging pharmacy's pharmacy acquisition cost, and
175 permit the pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim affected by the inability to procure the drug
176 at a cost that is equal to or less than the challenged maximum allowable cost.
177 (e) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not reimburse a pharmacy an amount less than the
178 amount that the pharmacy benefit manager reimburses a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate for
179 providing the same pharmacist services.
180 (f) A violation of this section shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice under
181 chapter 93A.
9 of 12

182 Section 9. (a) No pharmacy benefit manager or carrier may, either directly or indirectly
183 through an intermediary, agent or affiliate, engage in spread pricing. A pharmacy benefit
184 manager or carrier that violates this section shall be subject to the surcharge under section 8.
185 (b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall report to the commissioner on a quarterly basis, for
186 each health benefit plan with which it contracts, the data required to be collected by the center
187 for health information and analysis pursuant to section 10A of chapter 12C.
188 Section 10. (a) A pharmacy benefit manager or carrier shall be subject to a surcharge
189 payable to the division equal to 10 per cent of the aggregate dollar amount of reimbursements
190 paid by the pharmacy benefit manager or carrier to pharmacies in the previous contract year for
191 prescription drugs in the commonwealth if the pharmacy benefit manager or carrier: (i) engages
192 in spread pricing; or (ii) imposes point-of-sale fees or retroactive fees. A carrier shall be jointly
193 responsible to pay the surcharge amount for violations of this section by its contracted pharmacy
194 benefit manager; provided, however, that a carrier shall not be jointly responsible to pay the
195 surcharge amount for violations of this section by its contracted pharmacy benefit manager
196 unless the contract between the carrier and the pharmacy benefit manager permits conduct
197 prohibited by this section.
198 (b) A pharmacy benefit manager or carrier subject to enforcement action by the division
199 for a violation of this section shall, upon the filing of a written request with the division, be
200 afforded an adjudicatory hearing pursuant to chapter 30A.
201 Section 11. (a) When calculating an insured’s contribution to any applicable cost-sharing
202 requirement, a carrier shall include any cost-sharing amounts paid by the insured or on behalf of
203 the insured by another person. If under federal law, application of this requirement would result
10 of 12

204 in health savings account ineligibility under section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code,
205 this requirement shall apply for health savings account-qualified high deductible health plans
206 with respect to the deductible of such a plan after the insured has satisfied the minimum
207 deductible under section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, except for with respect to
208 items or services that are preventive care pursuant to section 223(c)(2)(C) of the federal Internal
209 Revenue Code, in which case the requirements of this paragraph shall apply regardless of
210 whether the minimum deductible under section 223 has been satisfied.
211 (b) A carrier, pharmacy benefit manager or third-party administrator shall not directly or
212 indirectly set, alter, implement or condition the terms of health benefit plan coverage, including
213 the benefit design, based in part or entirely on information about the availability or amount of
214 financial or product assistance available for a prescription drug.
215 (c) The division may promulgate such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary to
216 implement this section.
217 Section 12. A pharmacy benefit manager shall be required to submit to periodic audits by
218 a licensed carrier if the pharmacy benefit manager has entered into a contract with the carrier to
219 provide pharmacy benefits to the carrier or its members. The commissioner shall direct or
220 provide specifications for such audits.
221 Section 13. (a) A contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy shall not
222 include any provision that prohibits, restricts or limits a pharmacy or its employed pharmacists’
223 ability to provide an insured with information on the amount of the insured’s cost-sharing for
224 such insured’s prescription drug and the clinical efficacy of a more affordable alternative drug if
225 one is available. No contract shall penalize a pharmacy or an individual pharmacist for disclosing
11 of 12

226 such information to an insured or for dispensing to an insured a more affordable alternative
227 prescription drug if one is available.
228 (b) A pharmacy benefit manager shall not charge a pharmacy a fee related to the
229 adjudication of a claim unless such fee is set out in a contract between the pharmacy benefit
230 manager and the pharmacist or contracting agent or pharmacy, including, but not limited to, a fee
231 for: (i) the receipt and processing of a pharmacy claim; (ii) the development or management of
232 claims processing services in a pharmacy benefit manager network; or (iii) participation in a
233 pharmacy benefit manager network.
234 (c) A contract between a pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy shall not include any
235 provision that prohibits, restricts or limits disclosure of information to the division deemed
236 necessary by the division to ensure a pharmacy benefit manager’s compliance with the
237 requirements under this section or section 21C of chapter 94C.
12 of 12